Alaska statutes. Title 28. Motor Vehicles.
Article 6. Fees and Charges.

Collateral references. —

7A Am. Jur. 2d, Automobiles and Highway Traffic, § 71 et seq.

60 C.J.S., Motor Vehicles, §§ 344-346.

Sec. 28.10.411.
Registration fees levied.

For every year during any part of which a vehicle is subject to registration under this chapter, a registration fee shall be paid to the department at the time of original registration and at each biennial renewal of registration after that time.

[Repealed, 1983 Initiative Proposal No. 2, § 6.]

[Repealed, § 6 ch 70 SLA 1986.]

[Repealed, § 41 ch 37 SLA 1986.]

[Repealed, § 3 ch 89 SLA 1987.]

A resident 65 years of age or older on the date the registration fee is due or a resident with a disability that limits or impairs the ability to walk and who provides proof of that disability as provided in 23 C.F.R. 1235.2 is entitled to an exemption from the registration fee required under this section for one vehicle subject to registration under AS

28.10.421(b)(1)(A)

, (b)(2), (b)(4), or (j). An exemption may not be granted except upon written application for the exemption on a form prescribed by the department.

A person who presents satisfactory proof of current membership in the Alaska National Guard is entitled to an exemption from the registration fee required under this section for one vehicle subject to registration under AS

28.10.421(b)(1)(A)

, (b)(2), or (b)(4). An exemption may not be granted except upon written application for the exemption on a form prescribed by the department.

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978; am 1983 Initiative Proposal No. 2, § 6; am § 85 ch 6 SLA 1984; am § 41 ch 37 SLA 1986; am § 6 ch 60 SLA 1986; am § 6 ch 70 SLA 1986; am § 3 ch 89 SLA 1987; am § 58 ch 63 SLA 1993; am §§ 6, 7 ch 44 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 128 SLA 1998; am § 4 ch 46 SLA 2007; am § 3 ch 50 SLA 2014; am §§ 3, 4 ch 80 SLA 2014; am § 1 ch 88 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2014, to reconcile the changes to subsection (f) made in sec. 3, ch. 50, SLA 2014 and sec. 3, ch. 80, SLA 2014, a reference to paragraph (b)(5) was replaced with a reference to subsection (j).

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2014 amendment, effective January 1, 2015, in (f), substituted “AS

28.10.421(b)(1)

, (2) or (5), or (j)” for “AS

28.10.421(b)(1)

(2), (5) or (6)”.

The second 2014 amendment, effective January 1, 2015, in (f), substituted “AS

28.10.421(b)(1)

(A), (b)(2), (b)(4), or (b)(5)” for “AS

28.10.421(b)(1)

, (2), (5), or (6)” at the end of the first sentence; added (g).

The third 2014 amendment, effective January 1, 2015, in (f), substituted “on the date the registration fee is due” for “on January 1 of the year the vehicle is registered” following “65 years of age or older”.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 87, ch. 63, SLA 1993 provides “[i]f any section of this bill is found to violate the single subject rule it is severed from the rest of the bill.”

Sec. 28.10.420.
Assignment. [Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.10.421.
Registration fee rates.

Unless otherwise provided by law,

the fees prescribed in this section shall be paid to the department at the times provided under AS

28.10.108

and

28.10.111

; and

an additional fee of $10 shall be added to the registration fee set out in this section for registration not conducted by mail, on the department’s Internet website, or at an emissions inspection station or contract office offering vehicle registration services; the department may waive this additional fee for a good cause based on criteria established in regulations adopted by the department.

The biennial registration fees under this subsection are imposed within the following classifications for

a vehicle not exceeding 10,000 pounds unladen weight as established by the manufacturer’s advertised weight or on the actual weight, which the owner shall furnish, subject to the approval of the commissioner or the commissioner’s representative that is a

passenger vehicle, low-speed vehicle, pick-up truck, truck, or van not used or maintained for the transportation of persons or property for hire or for other commercial use and not registered in the name of a company or business . . . . . $100;

a taxicab . . . . . $160;

a motor home not used or maintained for the transportation of persons or property for hire or for other commercial use and not registered in the name of a company or business . . . . . $100;

a motor bus with a seating capacity of

less than 20 persons and used exclusively for commercial purposes in the transporting of visitors or tourists . . . . . $100;

20 or more persons and used exclusively for commercial purposes in the transporting of visitors or tourists . . . . . $300;

a motorcycle or a motor-driven cycle . . . . . $60.

The biennial registration fees under this subsection are imposed for a vehicle not subject to registration under (b) of this section and are based on the actual unladen weight as established by the manufacturer’s advertised weight or on the actual weight, which the owner shall furnish, subject to the approval of the commissioner or the commissioner’s representative, as follows:

up to and including 5,000 pounds . . . . . $180;

more than 5,000 pounds to and including 12,000 pounds . . . . . $268;

more than 12,000 pounds to and including 18,000 pounds . . . . . $516;

more than 18,000 pounds . . . . . $662.

The special registration fees under this subsection are imposed biennially, unless otherwise specified, for

a historic vehicle registered under

and that is driven or moved on a highway for the primary purpose of historical exhibition or similar activity, one time only upon initial registration under $10; AS

28.10.181

(b)(1) AS

28.10.181

(b) (B) AS

28.10.181(b)

(2) $30 plus the fee required for that vehicle under (b) of this section, unless the historic vehicle is eligible for the fee described under (C) of this paragraph; the fee required by this subparagraph shall be collected only on the first issuance and on the replacement of the historic plates; (C) AS

28.10.181(b)

(2) and that is driven or moved on a highway for the primary purpose of historical exhibition or similar activity, one time only upon initial registration under AS 28.10.181(b) $10;

special request plates for

Alaska National Guard personnel . . . . . $30;

veterans, retired veterans, or Lao veterans . . . . . $30;

recipients of the Purple Heart . . . . . none;

recipients of the Bronze Star awarded for valor, Silver Star, Navy Cross, Distinguished Service Cross, Air Force Cross, Coast Guard Cross, or other award reflecting valor . . . . . $30;

owners of custom collector vehicles . . . . . $50;

Iditarod race finishers . . . . . $50;

other special request plates . . . . . $30;

a vehicle owned by a person with a disability and registered under AS

28.10.181(d)

, or by a resident 65 years of age or older who files a written application for an exemption on a form prescribed by the department . . . . . . none;

a vehicle owned by the state . . . . . . none;

a vehicle owned by an elected state official . . . . . the fee required for that vehicle under (b), (c), (h), or (i) of this section;

a vehicle owned by a rancher, farmer, or dairy-man and registered under AS 28.10.181 . . . . . $68;

a snowmobile or off-highway vehicle . . . . . $10;

an amateur mobile radio station vehicle,

with a transceiver capable of less than 5-band operation . . . . . the fee required for that vehicle under (b) or (c) of this section;

in recognition of service to the public a mobile amateur radio station owned by an amateur with general class or higher license, provided the station must be satisfactorily proved capable of operating on at least five bands from 160 through 10 meters, must have an antenna, and must have a power supply and wiring as a permanent part of the vehicle; the transmitting unit may be removed from the car for service or dry storage . . . . . none for a mobile amateur radio station vehicle included in (b)(1)(A) of this section;

dealer registration plates

the initial set of plates . . . . . $88;

each subsequent set of plates . . . . . $50;

a vehicle owned by a municipality or charitable organization meeting the requirements of AS

28.10.181(e)

. . . . . $10;

a vehicle owned by a Pearl Harbor survivor, a former prisoner of war, a recipient of the Medal of Honor awarded by the President of the United States in the name of the United States Congress, or the spouse, parent, guardian, brother, sister, or dependent of a member of the United States armed forces killed in the line of duty . . . . . none;

special request university plates . . . . . $50 plus the fee required for that vehicle under (b), (c), (h), or (i) of this section; the fee required by this paragraph shall be collected only on the first issuance and on the replacement of special request plates; the commissioner of administration shall separately account by university campus designation for the fees received under this paragraph that the department deposits in the general fund; the annual estimated balance in the accounts that is in excess of the cost of issuing special request university plates may be appropriated by the legislature for the support of programs at each campus;

special request dog mushing plates . . . . . $50 plus the fee required for that vehicle under (b), (c), (h), or (i) of this section; the fee required by this paragraph shall be collected only on the first issuance and on the replacement of special request plates; the commissioner of administration shall separately account for the fees received under this paragraph that the department deposits in the general fund; notwithstanding (g) of this section, the annual estimated balance in the account that is in excess of the cost of issuing special request plates may be appropriated by the legislature for the support of programs benefiting dog mushing;

special request Alaska children’s trust plates . . . . . $100 plus the fee required for that vehicle under (b), (c), (h), or (i) of this section; the fee required by this paragraph shall be collected only on the first issuance and the replacement of special request plates; the commissioner of administration shall separately account for the fees received under this paragraph that the department deposits in the general fund; notwithstanding (g) of this section, the annual esti- mated balance in the account that is in excess of the cost of issuing special request plates may be appropriated by the legislature into the Alaska children’s trust grant account established in AS

37.14.205

;

[Repealed, § 8 ch 70, SLA 2018.]

special request plates commemorating Alaska veterans . . . . . $100 plus a fee of $35 and the fee required for that vehicle under (b), (c), (h), or (i) of this section; the $100 fee required by this paragraph shall be collected only on the first issuance of and the replacement of the commemorative veterans’ plates; the $35 fee required by this paragraph shall be collected biennially in the same manner as the fee required under (b), (c), (h), or (i) of this section; the commissioner of administration shall separately account for the fees received under this paragraph that the department deposits in the general fund; notwithstanding (g) of this section, the annual estimated balance in the account that is in excess of the cost of issuing special request plates may be appropriated by the legislature to the Alaska veterans’ cemetery fund created under AS

37.05.600

and for the support of programs benefiting Alaska veterans;

special request plates commemorating and supporting troops . . . . . $40 plus the fee required for that vehicle under (b), (c), (h), or (i) of this section; the $40 fee required by this paragraph shall be collected on issuance and biennial renewal in the same manner as the fee required under (b), (c), (h), or (i) of this section; the commissioner of administration shall separately account for the fees received under this paragraph that the department deposits in the general fund; notwithstanding (g) of this section, the annual estimated balance in the account that is in excess of the cost of issuing special request plates may be appropriated by the legislature to the organization for which the specialty license plate was purchased for the benefit of Alaska troops and their families;

special request plates for firefighter and emergency medical service provider . . . . . $30; plus the fee required for that vehicle under (b), (c), (h), or (i) of this section; the fee required by this paragraph shall be collected only on the first issuance of and the replacement of the plates;

special request fraternal organization member plates . . . . . $50 plus the fee required for that vehicle under (b), (c), (h), or (i) of this section; the $50 fee required by this paragraph shall be collected only on the first issuance of and the replacement of the plates;

special request United States flag “In God We Trust” plates . . . . . $30 plus the fee required for that vehicle under (b), (c), (h), or (i) of this section; the fee required by this paragraph shall be collected biennially in the same manner as the fee required under (b), (c), (h), or (i) of this section;

special request National Rifle Association plates . . . . . $50 plus the fee required for that vehicle under (b), (c), (h), or (i) of this section; the $50 fee required by this paragraph shall be collected only on the first issuance and the replacement of the special request plates; a $30 fee shall be collected biennially there- after in the same manner as the fee required under (b), (c), (h), or (i) of this section; the commissioner shall separately account for the fees received under this paragraph that the department deposits into the general fund; notwithstanding (g) of this section, the annual estimated balance in the account that is in excess of the cost of issuing special request plates may be appropriated by the legislature to establish and maintain a scholastic clay target program and for other youth shooting programs;

special request breast cancer awareness plates . . . . . $50 plus the fee required for that vehicle under (b), (c), (h), or (i) of this section; the $50 fee required by this paragraph shall be collected only on the first issuance and the replacement of the special request plates; the commissioner shall separately account for the fees received under this paragraph that the department deposits into the general fund; notwithstanding (g) of this section, the annual estimated balance in the account that is in excess of the cost of issuing special request plates may be appropriated by the legislature to programs that provide screening for breast and cervical cancer;

special request “Choose Life” plates . . . . . $30 plus the fee required for that vehicle under (b), (c), (h), or (i) of this section; the fee required by this paragraph shall be collected biennially in the same manner as the fee required under (b), (c), (h), or (i) of this section; the commissioner shall separately account for the fees received under this paragraph that the department deposits in the general fund; the annual estimated balance in the account that is in excess of the cost of issuing special request “Choose Life” plates may be appropriated by the legislature to programs supporting or benefiting adoption;

special request “Pro-Family, Pro-Choice” plates . . . . . $30 plus the fee required for that vehicle under (b), (c), (h), or (i) of this section; the fee required by this paragraph shall be collected biennially in the same manner as the fee required under (b), (c), (h), or (i) of this section; the commissioner shall separately account for the fees received under this paragraph that the department deposits in the general fund; the annual estimated balance in the account that is in excess of the cost of issuing special request “Pro-Family, Pro-Choice” plates may be appropriated to the Alaska Children’s Trust ( AS

37.14.200

);

special request Blood Bank of Alaska plates . . . . . $50 plus the fee required for that vehicle under (b), (c), (h), or (i) of this section; the fee required by this paragraph shall be collected biennially in the same manner as the fee required under (b), (c), (h), or (i) of this section; the commissioner of administration shall separately account for the fees received under this paragraph that the department deposits in the general fund; notwithstanding (g) of this section, the annual estimated balance in the account that is in excess of the cost of issuing special request plates may be appropriated by the legislature to the Blood Bank of Alaska.

A vehicle registered under this section which, by the removal of seats, a camper unit, a canopy or other equipment, may be converted into a vehicle on which the registration fee is computed on a different basis or in a different amount may not be driven or moved with seats, camper unit, canopy or other equipment removed unless the other applicable registration fee is paid.

In addition to the fees imposed under (b) and (d) of this section, the following special biennial registration fee is imposed upon renewal of registration for a passenger vehicle, motor home, pick-up truck, or a van with special request Winter Olympics commemorative plates . . . . . $60.

The fees collected by the department under this section shall be deposited in the general fund. The Department of Administration shall separately account for three percent of the fees collected under this section and deposited in the general fund. The annual estimated balance in the account may be used by the legislature to make appropriations for administration of AS

28.10.021(a)

and AS 28.22 (Alaska Mandatory Automobile Insurance Act).

The annual registration fees under this subsection for vehicles, including low-speed vehicles, used for commercial purposes are imposed and are based upon the actual unladen weight as established by the manufacturer’s advertised weight or upon the actual weight, which the owner shall furnish, subject to the approval of the commissioner or the commissioner’s representative, as follows:

up to and including 5,000 pounds . . . . . $90;

more than 5,000 pounds to and including 12,000 pounds . . . . . $134;

more than 12,000 pounds to and including 18,000 pounds . . . . . $258;

more than 18,000 pounds . . . . . $331.

A one-time registration fee of $20 is imposed upon initial registration for a trailer or semi-trailer used for commercial purposes.

When a person registers a trailer not used or maintained for the transportation of persons or property for hire or for other commercial use, including a boat trailer, baggage trailer, box trailer, utility trailer, house trailer, travel trailer, or trailer rented or offered for rent, the person may choose to pay a biennial registration fee of $30 or, if the person resides within the unorganized borough or in a municipality that elects, by passage of an appropriate ordinance, to allow the permanent registration of motor vehicles, to register the trailer permanently. If the person permanently registers the trailer, the person shall pay the biennial registration fee plus a permanent registration fee of $25. If the person permanently registers the trailer, no additional registration fees are required if the same person who initially registered the trailer continues to own the trailer. A new owner of a trailer previously registered under this subsection shall register and pay the biennial registration fee or the permanent registration fee as provided in this subsection. The motor vehicle registration tax for a permanently registered trailer is the rate established for permanent trailer registration under AS

28.10.431(j)

. If a municipality has not established a tax for a permanently registered trailer, the biennial rate established in AS

28.10.431(b)

or (j), if any, is levied upon the trailer and is payable only once at the time a trailer is permanently registered. If the person pays the registration tax as required by this subsection and AS

28.10.431

, no additional registration taxes are required if the same person who initially registered the trailer continues to own the trailer.

Click to view

plus the fee required for that vehicle under (b) of this section; the fee required by this paragraph shall be collected only on the first issuance and on the replacement of special request plates;

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978; am §§ 4, 5 ch 54 SLA 1979; am § 2 ch 151 SLA 1984; am § 41 ch 21 SLA 1985; am §§ 7 — 9 ch 60 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 70 SLA 1986; am §§ 6 — 8 ch 24 SLA 1988; am § 2 ch 72 SLA 1989; am § 2 ch 91 SLA 1989; am §§ 17, 18 ch 108 SLA 1989; am §§ 5, 6 ch 115 SLA 1989; am §§ 6, 9 ch 20 SLA 1990; am § 13 ch 90 SLA 1991; am § 4 ch 8 SLA 1993; am §§ 59, 60, 79 ch 63 SLA 1993; § 2 ch 56 SLA 1995; am §§ 8 — 12 ch 44 SLA 1996; am § 3 ch 97 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 5 SLA 1997; am § 3 ch 42 SLA 1997; am § 2 ch 36 SLA 1998; am § 18 ch 48 SLA 1998; am § 5 ch 88 SLA 1998; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 5 SLA 1999; am § 3 ch 44 SLA 2001; am §§ 2, 3 ch 11 SLA 2002; am § 2 ch 31 SLA 2002; am § 3 ch 56 SLA 2002; am §§ 1 — 4 ch 38 SLA 2003; am § 2 ch 68 SLA 2003; am § 13 ch 96 SLA 2005; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 95 SLA 2006; am §§ 5, 6 ch 14 SLA 2007; am § 5 ch 46 SLA 2007; am § 2 ch 2 SLA 2009; am § 2 ch 21 SLA 2009; am § 3 ch 115 SLA 2010; am § 2 ch 116 SLA 2010; am §§ 2, 3 ch 2 SLA 2012; am § 2 ch 45 SLA 2014; am §§ 4, 8 ch 50 SLA 2014; am §§ 5 — 7 ch 80 SLA 2014; am § 5 ch 98 SLA 2014; am §§ 3, 4 ch 15 SLA 2016; am §§ 5, 8 ch 70 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraph (d)(13) was enacted as (16); renumbered in 1996. Paragraph (d)(15) was enacted as paragraph (d)(14). Renumbered in 1998.

In 2014, paragraph (b)(6) was repealed in sec. 8, ch. 50, and replaced with (j); in sec. 5, ch. 80 (b)(6) was repealed and reenacted as (b)(5).
To reconcile the amendments, the reenacted (b)(5) was treated as repealed.

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2009 amendment, effective June 23, 2009, in paragraph (d)(2), added subparagraph (E), and redesignated former subparagraph (E) as subparagraph (F).

The second 2009 amendment, effective August 23, 2009, in paragraph (d)(16), added “to the Alaska veterans’ cemetery fund created under AS

37.05.600

and” following “appropriated by the legislature”.

The first 2010 amendment, effective September 29, 2010, in (d)(14), substituted “Alaska children’s trust grant account established in AS

37.14.205

” for “principal of the Alaska children’s trust under AS

37.14.200

”.

The second 2010 amendment, effective July 2, 2010, added (d)(18) and (19).

The 2012 amendment, effective March 8, 2012, in (d), added “or Lao veterans” at the end of (d)(2)(B), and added (d)(20) through (d)(24).

The first 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, in (a)(2), inserted “, on the department’s Internet website,” following “not conducted by mail” and deleted “not conducted” preceding “at an emissions inspection station”.

The second 2014 amendment, effective January 1, 2014, repealed (b)(6), and added (j).

The third 2014 amendment, effective January 1, 2015, rewrote (b); in (c), in the introductory language, inserted “for a vehicle not subject to registration under (b) of this section” following “under this subsection are imposed”, deleted “for a vehicle, including a low-speed vehicle and a motor vehicle pulling a trailer or semi-trailer, that is registered in the name of a company or business, or is used or maintained for the transportation of passengers for hire, excepting taxicabs and buses under (b) of this section, or for the transportation of property for hire or for other commercial purposes, including a low-speed vehicle, truck wrecker, tow car, hearse, ambulance, and tractor,” following “the commissioner’s representative”, and made stylistic changes; in (d)(8), substituted “included in (b)(1)(A)” for “included in (b)(1) or (2)” near the end of the paragraph.

The fourth 2014 amendment, effective January 1, 2015, in (d)(18), deleted the (A) and (B) designations, deleted “active” preceding “firefighter” and deleted (d)(18)(B), which read, “for former firefighter and emergency medical service provider
. . . . .
$50” and made a related change.

The 2016 amendment, effective August 31, 2016, in (d)(15), substituted “celebrating” for “commemorating” preceding “the arts”, increased the fee from $50 to $150, substituted “only on the first issuance and the replacement of the special request plates” for “biennially in the same manner as the fee required under (b), (c), (h), or (i) of this section”; added (d)(25).

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, added (d)(2)(D), repealed (d)(15), and made related changes.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 87, ch. 63, SLA 1993 provides “[i]f any section of this bill is found to violate the single subject rule it is severed from the rest of the bill.”

Sec. 28.10.423.
Emission control inspection program fees.

In addition to the biennial registration fee specified in AS

28.10.421

, a $2 fee is imposed upon every vehicle required to be inspected under an emission control program established under AS

46.14.400

or

46.14.510

. This fee shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner as the registration fee.

In addition to the permanent registration fee established in AS

28.10.155

, a $2 fee is imposed on the owner of each permanently registered motor vehicle required to be inspected under an emission control program established in AS

46.14.400

or

46.14.510

. That fee shall be collected biennially.

History.

(§ 2 ch 56 SLA 1985; am § 4 ch 74 SLA 1993; am § 3 ch 56 SLA 1995; am § 13 ch 44 SLA 1996; am § 5 ch 50 SLA 2014)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective January 1, 2015, added (b).

Sec. 28.10.430.
Release by lienholder. [Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.10.431.
Biennial motor vehicle registration tax.

There is levied a motor vehicle registration tax within each municipality that elects, by passage of an appropriate ordinance, to come under this section. A municipality shall file a written notice of election with the department and may not rescind the notice for a subsequent fiscal year. The notice must be filed on or before January 1 of the year preceding the year election under this section is to become effective. If a municipality has, before October 15, 1978, levied a motor vehicle registration or ad valorem tax that has been repealed by a vote of the people at any regular or special municipal election, then the election provided for in this subsection is not effective until the ordinance passed by the local governing body has been approved by the people at the next regularly scheduled general or special municipal election.

The biennial tax is levied upon motor vehicles subject to the registration fee under AS

28.10.411

and

28.10.421

and is based on the age of vehicles as determined by model year in the first year of the biennial period, according to the following schedule:

The registration tax shall be levied, collected, enforced, and otherwise administered in the same manner as provided for the registration fees in this chapter. Only one registration tax may be collected with respect to the same motor vehicle in the year for which the tax is paid.

If a person has paid both the registration fee levied in AS

28.10.411

and

28.10.421

and the registration tax levied in this section, and the department determines that the payor is entitled to a refund in whole or in part of the registration tax, the department shall make the refund to which the person is entitled. A refund may not be made unless application for a refund is filed with the department by December 31 of the year following the year for which the refund is claimed.

The department shall refund money collected under this section, less eight percent as collection costs, to a municipality for which the money was collected, as determined by (1) the address of residence of an individual required to pay the tax, or (2) the situs of the vehicle if the vehicle is not owned by an individual; the tax situs is the location at which the motor vehicle is usually, normally, or regularly kept or used during the registration period. For the first year in which the tax is levied within a municipality, the department may retain actual costs of collection of the tax within the municipality as determined by the department.

Money received by an organized borough under this section shall be allocated by the borough by ordinance for city, area outside city, and service area purposes within the borough.

Payment of the registration tax is in lieu of all local use taxes and ad valorem taxes on motor vehicles subject to the tax. A municipality which elects to come under the provisions of this section may not levy use or ad valorem taxes on motor vehicles subject to the registration tax during a fiscal year in which the election is in effect.

A vehicle owned by a former prisoner of war exempted from registration fees under AS

28.10.421(d)(11)

is subject to a motor vehicle registration tax under this section.

[Repealed, § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991.]

A municipality that imposes a motor vehicle registration tax as described under (a) of this section may also, by passage of an appropriate ordinance, increase the scheduled amount of tax described under (b) or (l) of this section, establish a tax for a motor vehicle that is permanently registered under AS

28.10.155

, or establish a tax for a trailer that is permanently registered under AS

28.10.421(j)

. A municipality that chooses to change the tax imposed under (b) or (l) of this section or establishes a tax for permanently registered motor vehicles or trailers shall file a written notice of the change with the department by January 1 of the year preceding the year in which the change in tax is to take effect. A municipality may not change the amount of the tax imposed under this section more than once every two years. The department may charge a municipality a one-time fee to cover the cost to the department of implementing a change under this subsection.

A vehicle registration application and renewal application for vehicles subject to a municipal vehicle registration tax shall itemize the total amount due in a manner that separately shows the amount of vehicle registration tax imposed by the municipality.

Notwithstanding (b) of this section, an annual tax is levied upon vehicles specified in AS

28.10.421

(c) and subject to the registration fee under AS

28.10.411

and

28.10.421

if the owner elects to register the vehicle annually as allowed under AS

28.10.108(f)

. The tax is based on the age of the vehicle as determined by model year according to the following schedule:

Tax According to Age of Vehicle Since Model Year: 1st 2nd 3rd 4th 5th 6th 7th 8th or over Motor Vehicle (1) motorcycle $ 17 $ 15 $ 13 $ 10 $ 7 $ 5 $ 4 $ 4 (2) vehicles specified
in AS

28.10.421

(b)(1)(A) or (3)(A) 121 99 77 55 39 28 19 16 (3) vehicles specified
in AS

28.10.421

(b)(1)(B) 121 99 77 55 39 28 19 16 (4) vehicles specified
in AS 28.10.421
(c)(1)-(4)
5,000 pounds
or less 121 99 77 55 39 28 19 16
5,001-12,000
pounds 198 154 121 99 77 55 33 22
12,001-18,000
pounds 447 392 348 304 260 227 205 194
18,001 pounds
or over 546 469 403 348 304 260 216 194 (5) vehicles specified
in AS 28.10.421
(b)(3)(B) 198 154 121 99 77 55 33 22 (6) vehicles specified
in AS

28.10.421(j)

17 15 13 10 7 5 4 4 (7) vehicles specified
in AS 28.10.421
(d)(8) 121 99 77 55 39 28 19 16 (8) vehicles eligible
for dealer
plates under
AS

28.10.421(d)(9)

88.

Click to view

Tax According to Age of Vehicle Since Model Year: 1st 2nd 3rd 4th 5th 6th 7th 8thor over Motor Vehicle
5,000 pounds or less $ 66 $ 55 $ 44 $ 33 $ 22 $ 17 $ 11 $ 8
5,001-12,000 pounds 110 88 66 55 44 33 22 11
12,001-18,000 pounds 240 207 185 163 141 119 107 97
18,001 pounds or over 295 251 218 185 161 141 119 97.

Click to view

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 3 ch 151 SLA 1984; am § 48 ch 138 SLA 1986; am § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991; am § 34 ch 30 SLA 1992; am § 61 ch 63 SLA 1993; am §§ 14, 15 ch 44 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 76 SLA 1996; am §§ 3, 4 ch 5 SLA 1997; am § 29 ch 32 SLA 1997; am §§ 4 — 6 ch 5 SLA 1999; am §§ 6, 7 ch 50 SLA 2014; am § 8 ch 80 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsections (j) and (k) were enacted as (i) and (j) respectively. Relettered upon enactment in 1996. In 2009, in (b)(1), “$4” was substituted for “$2” to correct a typographical error in ch. 32, SLA 1997.

In 2014, to reconcile the changes made in ch. 50, SLA 2014 and ch. 80, SLA 2014, the reference to “AS 28.10.421(b)(5)” in (b)(6) of this section as amended by sec. 8, ch. 80, SLA 2014 was replaced with the reference to “AS

28.10.421(j)

” as shown in sec. 6, ch. 50, SLA 2014.

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2014 amendment, effective January 1, 2014, in (b)(6), substituted “AS

28.10.421

(j)” for “AS

28.10.421

(b)(6)”; in (j), in the first sentence, inserted”, by passage of an appropriate ordinance,” following “this section may also”, and substituted “, establish a tax for a motor vehicle that is permanently registered under AS 28 10.155, or establish a tax for a trailer that is permanently registered under AS 28.10.421 (j)” for “by passage of an appropriate ordinance”, and in the second sentence inserted “or establishes a tax for permanently registered motor vehicles or trailers” following “of this section”.

The second 2014 amendment, effective January 1, 2015, in (b), in (b)(2), substituted “AS

28.10.421(b)(1)(A)

or (3)(A)” for “AS

28.10.421

(b)(1)”, in (b)(3), substituted “AS

28.10.421(b)(1)(B)

” for “AS

28.10.421(b)(3)

”, in (b)(5), substituted “AS

28.10.421(b)(3)(B)

” for “AS

28.10.421(b)(4)

”, in (b)(6), substituted “AS

28.10.421

(b)(5)” for “AS 28.10.421(b)(6)”, deleted (b)(8), relating to vehicles specified in AS

28.10.421(b)(2)

, and made a stylistic change.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 87, ch. 63, SLA 1993 provides “[i]f any section of this bill is found to violate the single subject rule it is severed from the rest of the bill.”

Opinions of attorney general. —

Since a borough’s election to request the department to collect the motor vehicle registration tax on its behalf and to remit those taxes to it was first in time, it should take precedence over the later request by a city within the borough. February 19, 1986, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 28.10.440.
Dismantled vehicle. [Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.10.441.
Schedule of other fees and charges.

The following fees and charges are imposed by the department for the stated services that it provides:

title fee, including transfer of title $15; (2) lien filing fee $15; (3) replacement of any registration plate set, including special request plates $5; (4) duplicate of original certificate of title $15; (5) duplicate of certificate of registration $2; (6) temporary preregistration permit issued under AS

28.10.031

none; (7) special transport permit issued under AS

28.10.151

$5; (8) special permit for vehicle used for transport of a person with a disability issued under AS

28.10.495

none.

Click to view

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 28 ch 85 SLA 1988; am § 4 ch 56 SLA 2002; am § 5 ch 38 SLA 2003)